District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0669.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Hair Braiding Licensing Modernization Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Subchapter I-B of Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official
Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-2853.01 is amended by adding a new paragraph (9) to read as follows:
“(9) “Hair braiding” means the twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking,
or braiding of hair, including the use of natural or synthetic fibers, and does not include the
application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or cutting of the hair.”.
(b) Section 47-2853.04(a)(13) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the
phrase “; except, hair braiding;” in its place.


(c) Section 47-2853.06(c) is amended by striking the phrase “such as braiding,
electrolysis, esthetics, manicuring and others” and inserting the phrase “such as electrolysis,
esthetics, manicuring and others” in its place.
(d) Section 47-2853.81is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “, braiding, coloring,” and inserting the phrase “, coloring,”
in its place.
(2) Strike the phrase “, weaving, or” and inserting the phrase “, or” in its place.
(3) Strike the phrase “of a person.” and inserting the phrase “of a person or hair
braiding.” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).